Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.321

Registration required.

Before doing business in this state, a foreign limited liability company must register with the secretary of state in accordance with Article 5 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7118; 2015 c 188 s 63.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.